cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX A Y 823
SFX A 0 сем/P .
SFX A 0 /R .
SFX A 0 ах [^аь]
SFX A 0 х а
SFX A 0 ех ь
SFX A 0 ӑн/RS [^ьуаӑо]
SFX A ь ӗн/RT ь
SFX A у ӑвӑн/RS у
SFX A 0 н/RS а
SFX A 0 а/RS [^ауьӑй]
SFX A ь е/RT ь
SFX A у ӑва/RS у
SFX A й я/RS й
SFX A 0 на/RS [аӑ]
SFX A 0 ра/RS [^р]
SFX A 0 та/RS [лнр]
SFX A 0 ри/RT [^р]
SFX A 0 ти/RT [лнр]
SFX A 0 ре/RT [^лнр]ь
SFX A 0 те/RT [лнр]ь
SFX A 0 ре/RT [лн]ь
SFX A 0 ран/RS [^аоьлнр]
SFX A 0 ран/RS [^лнр]ь
SFX A 0 тен/RS [лнр]ь
SFX A 0 рен/RS [лн]ь
SFX A 0 тан/RS [лнр]
SFX A 0 ран/RS [лн]
SFX A 0 па/RS [^ь]
SFX A 0 пе/RT ь
SFX A 0 сӑр/RS [^ь]
SFX A 0 сӗр/RT ь
SFX A 0 шӑн/RS [^ь]
SFX A 0 шӗн/RT ь
SFX A 0 ӑм/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑмсем/P [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑмӑр/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑмӑрсем/P [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 м/RS [аӑ]
SFX A 0 мӑр/RS [аӑ]
SFX A 0 мсем/P [аӑ]
SFX A 0 мӑрсем/P [аӑ]
SFX A у ӑвӑм/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑмӑр/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑмсем/P у
SFX A у ӑвӑмӑрсем/P у
SFX A ӑ вӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑӳыэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑм/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A 0 м/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 мӑр/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 мсем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 мӑрсем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 у/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑр/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 усем/P [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑрсем/P [^аӑу]
SFX A а у/RS а
SFX A а ӑр/RS а
SFX A а усем/P а
SFX A а ӑрсем/P а
SFX A у ӑву/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑр/RS у
SFX A у ӑвусем/P у
SFX A у ӑвӑрсем/P у
SFX A ӑ ву/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ ку/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лу/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ му/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ ну/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пу/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ ру/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ су/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫу/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ ту/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ ху/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чу/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шу/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑр/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ русем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шусем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ у/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 р/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A ӑ усем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 рсем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӗ/RT [^аӑутд]
SFX A т чӗ/RT т
SFX A д чӗ/RT д
SFX A 0 ӗсем/P [^аӑутд]
SFX A т чӗсем/P т
SFX A д чӗсем/P д
SFX A а и/RT а
SFX A а исем/P а
SFX A у ӑвӗ/RT у
SFX A у ӑвӗсем/P у
SFX A ӑ ви/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ ки/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ ли/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ ми/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ ни/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ ри/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ си/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ ти/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ ши/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ висем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ писем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ и/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A ӑ исем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӑмӑн/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑмӑрӑн/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 мӑн/RS а
SFX A 0 мӑрӑн/RS а
SFX A у ӑвӑмӑн/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑмӑрӑн/RS у
SFX A ӑ вӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A 0 мӑн/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 мӑрӑн/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ун/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑрӑн/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A а ун/RS а
SFX A а ӑрӑн/RS а
SFX A у ӑвун/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑрӑн/RS у
SFX A ӑ вун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шун/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑрӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ ун/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
