cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӑмха/A
ҫаран/A
ҫумӑр/A
ҫын/A
ӑйӑ/A
ӑнӑҫ/A
ӑнманлӑх/A
ӑратлӑх/A
ӑслӑлӑх/A
ӑстай/A
ӗҫхалӑх/A
Адамар/A
Айтапа/A
Аксёнович/A
Алик/A
Алюк/A
Анисим/A
Апаш/A
Арихва/A
Артур/A
Афанасьевич/A
Ашапатман/A
Баскунчак/A
Белфаст/A
Богородск/A
Бремен/A
Вадик/A
Ванюркка/A
Велла/A
Викентьевич/A
Витольд/A
Волоколамск/A
Вячеславович/A
Гейзенберг/A
Гессен/A
Горчаков/A
Гюйгенс/A
Дармштадт/A
Джим/A
Днестр/A
Евклид/A
Ентирук/A
Етруҫ/A
Загорск/A
Зенон/A
Иерусалим/A
Иллинойс/A
Ильмухха/A
Иоанн/A
Иркутск/A
Исса/A
Йоханнесбург/A
Кӗлпук/A
Калимантан/A
Капитонович/A
Каспийск/A
Кеплер/A
Кливленд/A
Константин/A
Краснодар/A
Культюк/A
Лаврентий/A
Ленск/A
Лискав/A
Людовик/A
Маҫӑк/A
Майраслу/A
Марк/A
Матур/A
Мец/A
Минеслу/A
Минулла/A
Митруҫ/A
Могилёв/A
Муккаҫ/A
Мюнхен/A
Наумович/A
Нефтеюганск/A
Новокуйбышевск/A
Нюмкка/A
Окленд/A
Осипович/A
Павел/A
Паймушка/A
Палех/A
Паттюк/A
Петӑрка/A
Пиклат/A
Пинеслу/A
Питриван/A
Платон/A
Приморск/A
Пхеньян/A
Ричард/A
Руан/A
Саарбрюккен/A
Саймула/A
Самсон/A
Саров/A
Сахвура/A
Севан/A
Сеньтук/A
Серхиван/A
Сидорович/A
Симук/A
Ситулла/A
Сорокин/A
Стихвун/A
Сэм/A
Тайта/A
Тегеран/A
Тимӗрхан/A
Тобол/A
Трофим/A
Туктакал/A
Тухсар/A
Ужгород/A
Ульянов/A
Урасай/A
Утьруҫ/A
Федосеевич/A
Фомич/A
Хӗрчукка/A
Хвалынск/A
Хунтюк/A
Чантӑр/A
Шӗвертюк/A
Шерккук/A
Шурик/A
Эливан/A
Эммануилович/A
Эрнюк/A
Юнас/A
Якутск/A
Яраслав/A
Ятук/A
абазин/A
абсурд/A
аванс/A
авиаотряд/A
аврашка/A
автокар/A
автопилот/A
автотранспорт/A
агитпуйӑс/A
адмирал/A
айӑк/A
айлӑмлӑх/A
акам/A
аккордеонист/A
акциз/A
алгоритм/A
алмаккай/A
алылмаш/A
альянс/A
ампӑс/A
аналӑх/A
ангидрид/A
анрав/A
антикоммунизм/A
антоним/A
апат/A
арҫын/A
арлӑх/A
арта/A
архиепископ/A
асаплантару/A
асфальт/A
аукционист/A
ашӑ/A
баклан/A
барабан/A
бекон/A
билетер/A
большевизм/A
брезент/A
булочнӑй/A
бюстгальтер/A
вӑрманпромхоз/A
валашка/A
ватин/A
верховнӑй/A
вираж/A
вольтметр/A
выҫлӑх/A
гангстер/A
гемоглобин/A
гетто/A
гладиолус/A
градусник/A
групорг/A
дебитор/A
департамент/A
диалог/A
дипломник/A
докладчик/A
дружинник/A
желатин/A
закрой/A
звонок/A
идейӑсӑр/A
имидж/A
индус/A
интурист/A
йӑлӑм/AE
йӑпар/AE
йогурт/A
кӑйӑк/A
кӑмӑш/A
кӑрчама/A
кӑшшавуй/A
каварлашу/A
кактус/A
калуш/A
каникул/A
капитализм/A
карӑм/A
кардиограф/A
картлашкалӑх/A
касмак/A
катрашка/A
каяшлӑх/A
киловатт/A
кинотеатр/A
климакс/A
коллаж/A
комбинезон/A
компрессор/A
конспект/A
концессионер/A
корт/A
краевед/A
крокет/A
куйкӑрӑш/A
культработник/A
купарча/A
курнӑҫланчӑк/A
кутамас/A
лӑсканчӑк/A
лам/A
лапрака/AE
лацкан/A
лесовод/A
лиризм/A
логикӑсӑрлӑх/A
лутӑрканчӑк/A
мӑкӑрланчӑк/A
мӑх/A
мадьяр/A
маклер/A
манер/A
март/A
матрос/A
медработник/A
метастаз/A
микроскоп/A
мистер/A
монополист/A
мрамор/A
муртӑх/A
нӑклӑх/A
нар/A
нацист/A
нигилист/A
нушта/A
оклад/A
опытник/A
отвес/A
пӑлтӑрка/A
пӑркаланчӑк/A
пӑхав/A
пайӑрка/A
палисадник/A
пант/A
параметр/A
партас/A
пасьянс/A
пахча/A
перегон/A
пикетчик/A
плавун/A
плинтус/A
подрывник/A
полицмейстер/A
поручик/A
прапай/A
приклад/A
провинциаллӑх/A
пропагандист/A
профсоюз/A
пукан/A
пулу/A
пусӑ/A
путуш/A
пыркка/A
радиоприемник/A
рак/A
рационализм/A
регион/A
реквизит/A
республиканец/A
рококо/A
рядовой/A
сӑн/A
сӑртлӑх/A
саванна/A
салам/A
сангвиник/A
сапфир/A
сателлит/A
священник/A
сенаж/A
силомер/A
скат/A
славянофил/A
совнархоз/A
союз/A
спутник/A
стеблеподъёмник/A
страус/A
суворовец/A
сулхӑнлӑх/A
суркам/A
счетовод/A
сыхлӑх/A
тӑйлӑк/A
тӑмса/A
тӑрӑс/A
тӑтӑрха/A
тавӑрӑнчӑк/A
такрак/A
тамариск/A
тапкалану/A
таткӑҫ/A
телепередатчик/A
тестер/A
толстолобик/A
трактат/A
трибун/A
туй/AH
тумхахсӑр/A
тупка/A
турпас/A
тутлӑлӑх/A
тытӑнчӑк/A
увольнительнӑй/A
уйхир/A
ултавҫӑ/A
управдом/A
урхамах/A
утконос/A
уяв/A
фарватер/A
фетиш/A
финноз/A
формалин/A
фрагмент/A
фюрер/A
хӑлхасӑр/A
хӑрпӑк/A
хӑю/A
хавшаклӑх/A
халцедон/A
хастарлӑх/A
хоккеист/A
хуйхӑ/A
хупӑрлӑх/A
хурланчӑк/A
хушӑк/A
хырӑмлӑх/A
цент/A
чӑкӑлташу/A
чӑрӑш/A
чакӑл/A
чарлан/A
член/A
чыс/A
шӑнӑҫулӑх/A
шӑратӑм/A
шайлашу/A
шанкӑрма/A
шарнир/A
шевиот/A
шлифовальщик/A
шпунт/A
шуйттан/A
шухӑшсӑр/A
ылма/A
эвфемизм/A
экспорт/A
электромонтаж/A
эпилог/A
этюдник/A
юнион/A
юрист/A
явап/A
янах/A
ясарлӑх/A
